District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-225.14

Auction of property unfit for service; proceeds.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1883, 22 Stat. 470, ch. 95, § 1
April 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259,§ 408, 44 DCR 1423
1981 Ed., § 1-1123.
1973 Ed., § 1-818.